Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2027
Retirement benefit; adjusted by increase in cost of living.

Each retired officer of the Nebraska State Patrol, or surviving beneficiary who is receiving a retirement benefit as of December 31, 1977, shall have such retirement benefits adjusted by the increase in the cost of living, as determined by the difference between the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers from the date his or her retirement benefit commenced and January 1, 1978.

Laws 1977, LB 347, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 108;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 60-452.02.